Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 17.1. Automobile Repair Facilities Act.

§ 59.1-207.1.
Title of chapter.

This chapter may be cited as the Automobile Repair Facilities Act.

History.
1979, c. 506.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 217 (1980).

§ 59.1-207.2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Motor vehicle” shall mean every vehicle which is self-propelled or designed for self-propulsion and every vehicle drawn by or designed to be drawn by a motor vehicle and includes every device in, upon or by which any property is or can be transported
or drawn upon a highway, whether or not required to be licensed by the Commonwealth, but shall not include devices moved by human or animal power or devices used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks. Nor shall it include
those parts of a manufactured home which do not affect the ability of the manufactured home to be safely upon a highway.

“Person” shall include any natural person, firm, partnership, association or corporation.

“Automobile repair facility” shall mean any person who for profit diagnoses or corrects malfunctions of, or damage to, a motor vehicle.

History.
1979, c. 506; 1999, c. 77.

§ 59.1-207.3.
Written estimate for repair work required upon request; charge in excess of estimate; conditions; display of sign required; limitations on liability for delay; exception.

Upon request by a customer, prior to the commencement of any repair work on a motor vehicle for which a customer may be charged more than $25, every automobile repair facility doing business in the Commonwealth shall provide the customer a written statement
of (i) the estimated cost of labor necessary to complete the work, (ii) the estimated cost of parts necessary to complete work, (iii) a description of the problem or work as described or authorized by the customer, and (iv) the
estimated completion time. An automobile repair facility shall have no obligation to provide such written statements prior to 10:00 a.m. or after 4:00 p.m. during a working day.

Where a written estimate is requested, no repair work on the motor vehicle may be undertaken, other than such diagnostic work as may be necessary for the preparation of an estimate, until the written estimate has been provided the customer and the customer
has authorized the work, either in writing or orally, and no charge for repair work in excess of the written estimate by more than 10 percent or, in the case of any motor vehicle which is at least 25 model years old, 20 percent
or extension of the time for the work may be made unless the additional work represented by such excess charge or the time extension has been authorized, in writing or orally, by the customer.

An automobile repair facility may impose reasonable conditions for its obligations to provide written estimates to a customer, including the imposition of a reasonable fee for the preparation of a written estimate and related diagnostic work; provided
that any such conditions shall be disclosed to the customer at the time of his request by writing or by sign conspicuously posted at the entrance of the automobile repair facility.Each automobile repair facility shall display in
a conspicuous place at any point where vehicles are normally received for repairs, a sign which states that:

The customer may receive a written estimate on request;

No repair work charge may exceed the written estimate by more than 10 percent unless the additional work represented by the excess charge has been authorized by the customer;

Any conditions imposed by the automobile repair facility in providing written estimates, such as the limited hours when written estimates will be prepared or the amount of the reasonable fee charged for preparing a written estimate and for related diagnostic
work;

The facility shall offer to return all replaced parts except warranty, core charge or trade-in parts required to be returned to a manufacturer or distributor; and

Any complaints can be made to the Division of Consumer Counsel of the Department of Law.The sign heading “Customer Rights” shall be in letters at least one and one-half inches high and the remaining print shall be in letters at least one-fourth inch high
with spacing between letters, words and lines so as to be clearly legible.

An automobile repair facility shall not be liable for breach of the written estimated completion date for a repair if the delay is occasioned by (i) an act of God or (ii) an unexpected shortage of labor or parts or (iii) other causes beyond the control
of the automobile repair facility.

Nothing in this section shall require an automobile repair facility to give a written estimate if the facility is unwilling to perform the requested repair work.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the repair of any motor vehicle which is any car listed in the Official Judging Manual of the Antique Automobile Club of America.

History.
1979, c. 506; 1995, c. 110; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 16 provides: “That the Governor may transfer an appropriation or any portion thereof within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, or from one such
agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, provided that any such transfer shall be limited to salary and fringe benefits
for any personnel transferred and reasonable administrative overhead and costs.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 13, are identical, and substituted “Division of Consumer Counsel of the Department of Law” for “Virginia Office of Consumer Affairs” in subdivision C 5; and made stylistic changes.

§ 59.1-207.4.
Offer to return replaced parts required; customer’s right to inspect parts.

An automobile repair facility shall offer at the time the repair work is authorized to return to the customer any parts which are removed from the motor vehicle and replaced during the process of repair; provided that any part which is required to be
returned to a manufacturer or distributor under a warranty agreement, trade-in agreement or core charge agreement for a reconditioned part need not be returned to the customer. If the customer wishes the return of replaced parts subject
to core charge or other trade-in agreements, customer agrees to pay the facility the additional core charge or other trade-in fee. The customer retains the right to inspect requested returned parts even if custody is refused.

History.
1979, c. 506.

§ 59.1-207.5.
Written invoice required upon completion of repair work.

Upon completion of any repair work on a motor vehicle, including work performed pursuant to any warranty, an automobile repair facility shall provide the customer a written invoice which clearly indicates the work performed and the charges for parts and
labor, separately stated, and which separately identifies those parts provided under warranty and not under warranty, and identifies those parts, if any, which are used, rebuilt or reconditioned. The provisions of this section shall
not apply to work performed which was done on an advertised single price basis.

History.
1979, c. 506.

§ 59.1-207.5:1.
Sale or installation of motor vehicle glass; prohibited conduct.

No person selling or engaged in the sale, installation, or replacement of motor vehicle glass shall advertise, promise to provide, or offer any coupon, credit, or rebate to pay all or part of an insurance deductible under a policy of motor vehicle insurance,
as defined in §

38.2-124

, unless such person charges no more than the prevailing market rate for such services.

History.
2003, c. 707.

§ 59.1-207.6.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice pursuant to the provisions of § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of Chapter 17 (§ 59.1-196 et seq.) of this title.

History.
1979, c. 506.